Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.12.100

Destroying or secreting records—Penalty.

Every officer, director, or employee or agent of any bank or holding company who, for the purpose of concealing any fact or suppressing any evidence against himself or herself, or against any other person, abstracts, removes, mutilates, destroys or secretes any paper, book or record of any bank or holding company, or of the director, or of anyone connected with his or her office, is guilty of a class B felony punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW.

[ 2014 c 37 s 182; 2010 c 88 s 27; 2003 c 53 s 187; 1994 c 92 s 71; 1955 c 33 s 30.12.100. Prior: 1917 c 80 s 56; RRS s 3264. Formerly RCW 30.12.100.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2010 c 88: See RCW 32.50.900.

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.